Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1406
Adaptive management
plan; completion; update; Nebraska Invasive Species Council; reports; subcommittees.

(1) The adaptive management plan required under section 37-1404
shall be updated at least once every three years following its initial development.
The plan shall be submitted to the Governor and the Agriculture Committee
of the Legislature. The plan
submitted to the committee shall be submitted electronically.

(2) The Nebraska Invasive Species Council shall submit an
annual report of its activities to the Governor and the Agriculture Committee
of the Legislature by December 15 of each year. The annual report shall include
an evaluation of progress made in the preceding year. The report submitted to the committee shall be submitted
electronically.

(3) The council shall complete the initial adaptive management
plan within three years after April 6, 2012.

(4) Prior to the start of the 2015 legislative session, the
council shall submit electronically a report
to the Agriculture Committee of the Legislature that makes recommendations
as to the extension or modification of the council.

(5) The council may establish advisory and technical subcommittees
that the council considers necessary to aid and advise it in the performance
of its functions.

Laws 2012, LB391, § 16;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 5.